Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-8,132
Licensee; bond; conditions.

No license shall be granted unless the licensee has executed a bond in the sum of not less than one thousand dollars in the case of amateur mixed martial arts, amateur muay thai, or amateur kickboxing nor less than five thousand dollars in the case of professional mixed martial arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial arts on ice, professional muay thai, professional boxing, professional kickboxing, or professional bare-knuckle boxing. The license shall be approved by the State Athletic Commissioner, conditioned on the faithful compliance by the licensee with the provisions of sections 81-8,129 to 81-8,142.01, the rules and regulations of the commissioner, and such other laws of the state as may be applicable to anything done by the licensee in pursuance of the license.

Laws 1957, c. 382, § 5, p. 1328;

Laws 1980, LB 849, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB471, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB869, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB291, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB70, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB635, § 4.